Washington statutes.
RCW 36.60.010

Establishment of district—Boundaries—Powers.

Subject to RCW 36.60.020, the legislative authority of a county may establish one or more county rail districts within the county for the purpose of providing and funding improved rail freight or passenger service, or both. The boundaries of county rail districts shall be drawn to include contiguous property in an area from which agricultural or other goods could be shipped by the rail service provided. The district shall not include property outside this area which does not, or, in the judgment of the county legislative authority, is not expected to produce goods which can be shipped by rail, or property substantially devoted to fruit crops or producing goods that are shipped in a direction away from the district. A county rail district is a quasi municipal corporation, an independent taxing "authority" within the meaning of Article VII, section 1 of the state Constitution, and a "taxing district" within the meaning of Article VII, section 2 of the state Constitution.

A county rail district shall constitute a body corporate and shall possess all the usual powers of a corporation for public purposes as well as all other powers that may now or hereafter be specifically conferred by statute, including, but not limited to, the authority to hire employees, staff, and services, to enter into contracts, to accept and expend or use gifts, grants, and donations, and to sue and be sued.

The county legislative authority shall be the governing body of a county rail district. The county treasurer shall act as the ex officio treasurer of the county rail district. The electors of a district are all registered voters residing within the district.

This authority and that provided in RCW 36.60.030 may only be exercised outside the boundaries of the county rail district if such extraterritorial rail services, equipment, or facilities are found, by resolution of the county legislative authority exercising such authority, to be reasonably necessary to link the rail services, equipment, and facilities within the rail district to an interstate railroad system; however, if such extraterritorial rail services, equipment, or facilities are in or are to be located in one or more other counties, the legislative authority of such other county must consent by resolution to the proposed plan of the originating county which consent shall not be unreasonably withheld.

[ 2001 c 58 s 1; 1985 c 187 s 1; 1983 c 303 s 8.]